North Dakota, session 69, HB1088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-01-03.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-01-03.3. Penalty for violation of title.
1. Unless otherwise provided by law, a person who violates this title is subject, after hearing by
the commissioner, to payment of an administrative monetary penaltyfine of up to ten thousand
dollars for each violation.
2. In addition to or in lieu of a monetary fine, the commissioner, after a hearing, may require
restitution in the amount of direct financial loss be made to any person directly harmed by a
violation of this title. The commissioner may not determine or adjudicate whether an obligation
is owed under a policy or contract of insurance, or require a person to pay a claim or an
amount claimed owed under a policy or contract of insurance.

H. B. NO. 1088 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1088.
House Vote: Yeas 76 Nays 13 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State